Massachusetts, session 194th, H1729.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “residence.”, in line 19, the following
words:- The officer shall provide notice of a domestic violence shelter that serves the
municipality. Where said person's native language is not English, the statement shall be then
provided in said person's native language, through translation, electronic translation services, or
written translation, whenever possible.
of 1